Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Child Care Services

§ 3511.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Child” means an individual under 13 years of age.

“Child care facility” means any place or program operated as a business or service on a regular or continuous basis, whether for compensation or not, whose primary function is protection, care, and supervision of children under 16 years of age outside their homes for periods of fewer than 24 hours a day by a person other than a child’s own parent, guardian, or relative, as defined by rules adopted by the Department for Children and Families, but not including a kindergarten approved by the State Board of Education.

“Child care provider” means a person licensed or registered by the Department for Children and Families, or authorized by the Department, to provide child care.

“Child care services” include developmentally appropriate care and supervision for children under 13 years of age for fewer than 24 hours a day by a child care provider.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner for Children and Families.

“Division” means the Child Development Division.

“Family child care home” means a child care facility that provides care on a regular basis in the caregiver’s own residence for not more than 10 children at any one time. Of this number, up to six children may be provided care on a full-time basis and the remainder on a part-time basis. As used in this subdivision, care of a child on a part-time basis shall mean care of a school-age child for not more than four hours a day. These limits shall not include children who reside in the residence of the caregiver, except:

These part-time, school-age children may be cared for on a full-day basis during school closing days, snow days, and vacation days that occur during the school year.

During the school summer vacation, up to 12 children may be cared for, provided that at least six of these children are of school age and a second staff person is present and on duty when the number of children in attendance exceeds six. These limits shall not include children who are required by law to attend school (seven years of age and older) and who reside in the residence of the caregiver.

“Training” means an activity, approved by the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee, that is likely to lead to employment or required to maintain employment.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1997, No. 31

, § 1;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 110;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 63, eff. May 20, 2014;

2019, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Oct. 5, 2020;

2019, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2021.

§ 3512.
Child Care Financial Assistance Program; eligibility.

The Child Care Financial Assistance Program is established to subsidize, to the extent that funds permit, the costs of child care for families that need child care services in order to obtain employment, to retain employment, or to obtain training leading to employment. Families seeking employment shall be entitled to participate in the Program for up to three months and the Commissioner may further extend that period.
(a) (1) The Child Care Financial Assistance Program is established to subsidize, to the extent that funds permit, the costs of child care for families that need child care services in order to obtain employment, to retain employment, or to obtain training leading to employment. Families seeking employment shall be entitled to participate in the Program for up to three months and the Commissioner may further extend that period.

The subsidy authorized by this subsection shall be established by the Commissioner, by rule, and shall bear a reasonable relationship to income and family size. Families shall be found eligible using an income eligibility scale based on the current federal poverty level and adjusted for the size of the family. Co-payments shall be assigned to the whole family and shall not increase if more than one eligible child is enrolled in child care. Families with an annual gross income of less than or equal to 150 percent of the current federal poverty guidelines shall not have a family co-payment. Families with an annual gross income up to and including 350 percent of current federal poverty guidelines, adjusted for family size, shall be eligible for a subsidy authorized by the subsection. The scale shall be structured so that it encourages employment. If the federal poverty guidelines decrease in a given year, the Division shall maintain the previous year’s federal poverty guidelines for the purpose of determining eligibility and benefit amount under this subsection.

Earnings deposited in a qualified child education savings account, such as the Vermont Higher Education Investment Plan, established in

16 V.S.A. § 2877

, or any similar plan qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 529, shall be disregarded in determining the amount of a family’s income for the purpose of determining continuing eligibility.

After September 30, 2021, a regulated center-based child care program or family child care home as defined by the Department in rule shall not receive funds pursuant to this subsection that are in excess of the usual and customary rate for services at the center-based child care program or family child care home.

An Enhanced Child Care Services Subsidy Program is established for families participating in the Reach Ahead program.
(b) (1) An Enhanced Child Care Services Subsidy Program is established for families participating in the Reach Ahead program.

The Enhanced Child Care Services Subsidy Program established by this subsection shall be administered by the Department’s Child Development Division. The Commissioner shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of the Program pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

The subsidy authorized by this subsection shall be no greater than 100 percent of the subsidy provided in subsection (a) of this section.

A participating family shall remain eligible for the Enhanced Child Care Services Subsidy Program between 12 and 24 months as long as one or more dependent children of a working parent or parents are receiving child care services. The Commissioner for Children and Families may extend the subsidy beyond 24 months if the Commissioners for Children and Families and of Finance and Management determine jointly that an extension can be accommodated within appropriated resources.

The Enhanced Child Care Services Subsidy Program shall be funded through savings resulting from caseload reductions in the Reach Up program. If there are insufficient savings from caseload reductions to fund the Program, the Program shall be suspended or modified.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2007, No. 30

, § 23, eff. May 17, 2007;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.318.1;

2013, No. 198

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2015;

2017, No. 29

, § 3;

2019, No. 72

, § E.318;

2021, No. 45

, § 2, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.

§ 3513.
Protective and family support child care services.

The Division shall establish a program that subsidizes, in whole or in part, the cost of child care services provided to protective services children or to families for the purpose of preserving, rehabilitating, or reunifying such families.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 205

, (Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 64, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 3514.
Payment to providers.

The Commissioner shall establish a payment schedule for purposes of reimbursing providers for full- or part-time child care services rendered to families who participate in the programs established under section 3512 or 3513 of this title. Payments established under this section shall reflect the following considerations: whether the provider operates a licensed child care facility or a registered family child care home, type of service provided, cost of providing the service, and the prevailing market rate for comparable service. Payments shall be based on enrollment status or any other basis agreed to by the provider and the Division.

The Commissioner may establish a separate payment schedule for child care providers who have received specialized training, approved by the Commissioner, relating to protective or family support services.

The payment schedule established by the Commissioner may reimburse providers in accordance with the results of the most recent Vermont Child Care Market Rate Survey.
(c) (1) The payment schedule established by the Commissioner may reimburse providers in accordance with the results of the most recent Vermont Child Care Market Rate Survey.

The payment schedule shall include reimbursement rate caps tiered in relation to provider ratings in the Vermont STARS program. The lower limit of the reimbursement rate caps shall be not less than the 50th percentile of all reported rates for the same provider setting in each rate category.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 111;

2021, No. 45

, § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.